Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-4056
Examination; exemptions.

(1) An individual who applies for an insurance producer license in this state who was previously licensed for the same lines of authority in another state shall not be required to complete any examination. This exemption is only available if the person is currently licensed in that state or if the application is received within ninety days of the cancellation of the applicant's previous license and if the prior state issues a certification that, at the time of cancellation, the applicant was in good standing in that state or that state's producer data base records, maintained by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or its affiliates or subsidiaries, indicate that the producer is or was licensed in good standing for the line of authority requested.

(2) A person licensed as an insurance producer in another state who moves to this state shall make application within ninety days of establishing legal residence to become a resident licensee pursuant to section 44-4053. No examination shall be required of that person to obtain any line of authority previously held in the prior state except if the director determines otherwise by rule and regulation.

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 10;

Laws 2018, LB743, § 25.